







































 

 

 

 

 

 

 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 
 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 
  

Token seller 

Token name 

Token ticker 

Project name 

Public sale 

 

GBX Limited 

Rock Token 

RKT 

“Gibraltar Blockchain Exchange” or “GBX” 

Approximately early February 2018 unless fully sold prior 

 

This whitepaper is not endorsed by any government authority. It is only available on www.gbx.gi and may not 

be redistributed, reproduced or passed on to any other person or published, in part or in whole, for any purpose, 

without the prior, written consent of GBX Limited. This whitepaper, in full or part, must not be taken or 

transmitted to any country where distribution or dissemination of this whitepaper is prohibited or restricted. 

Persons into whose possession this whitepaper may come are required to inform themselves about and to 

observe any relevant legal or regulatory restrictions and seek all necessary professional advice. By accessing this 

whitepaper, you agree to be bound by this requirement. 

Version 1.0      8 January 2018 

GBX+ 
Rock Token Sale 

Whitepaper 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 2 

    

 

 

 

IMPORTANT NOTICE 
 
This document and any other documents published in association with this whitepaper relate to a token offering 
of Rock Token to persons (purchasers) and in respect of the intended development and use of GBX and the 
GBX ecosystem by various participants.  
 

No offer of regulated products:  this document does not constitute an offer or solicitation of securities or 

any other regulated product, nor a promotion, invitation or solicitation for investment purposes. The terms of the 
purchase are not intended to be a financial service offering document or a prospectus. The Rock Token 
involves and relates to the development and use of experimental platforms (software) and technologies that 
may not come to fruition or achieve the objectives specified in this whitepaper. The Rock Tokens do not 
represent equity, shares, units, royalties or rights to capital, profit, returns or income in the platform or software 
or in GBX Limited or any other company or intellectual property associated with the platform or any other public 
or private enterprise, corporation, foundation or other entity in any jurisdiction. The Rock Tokens are not 
intended to represent a security or similar legal interest. 
 

No advice:  this whitepaper does not constitute advice to purchase any Rock Tokens nor should it be relied 

upon in connection with, any contract or purchasing decision. 
 

Risk warning:  the purchase of Rock Tokens carries with it significant risks. Prior to purchasing Rock 

Tokens, you should carefully assess and take into account the risks, including those listed on www.gbx.gi.  
 

Obtain all necessary professional advice:  you should consult a lawyer, accountant and/or tax 

professional as needed prior to determining whether to purchase Rock Tokens. 
 

This whitepaper describes a future project: this whitepaper contains forward-looking statements that 

are based on the beliefs of GBX Limited, as well as certain assumptions made by and information available to 
GBX Limited.  The project as envisaged in this whitepaper is under development and is being constantly 
updated, including but not limited to key governance and technical features. Accordingly, if and when the 
project is completed, it may differ significantly from the project set out in this whitepaper.  No representation or 
warranty is given as to the achievement or reasonableness of any plans, future projections or prospects and 
nothing in this document is or should be relied upon as a promise or representation as to the future. 
 

Licences and approvals are not assured in all jurisdictions:  GBX Limited and its group members 

intend to operate in full compliance with applicable laws and regulations and obtain the necessary licences and 
approvals in key markets.  This means that the development and rollout of all the features of the ecosystem 
described in this whitepaper are not guaranteed.  Regulatory licences and/or approvals are likely to be required 
in Gibraltar and, potentially, a number of relevant jurisdictions in which relevant activities may take place.  It is 
not possible to guarantee, and no person makes any assurances, that any such licences or approvals will be 
obtained within a particular timeframe or at all.  This means that GBX and other features of the proposed 
ecosystem may not be available in certain markets, or at all.  This could require restructuring of that ecosystem 
and/or its unavailability in all or certain respects.    
 

Views of GBX Limited only:  the views and opinions expressed in this whitepaper are those of GBX 

Limited and do not necessarily reflect the official policy or position of any government, quasi-government, 
authority or public body (including but not limited to any regulatory body of any jurisdiction) in any jurisdiction.  
Information contained in this whitepaper is based on sources considered reliable by GBX Limited but there is 
no assurance as to their accuracy or completeness.    
 

Authorised language of this whitepaper:  this whitepaper and related materials are issued in English 

only. Any translation is for reference purposes only and is not certified by GBX Limited or any other person. No 
assurance can be made as to the accuracy and completeness of any translations. If there is any inconsistency 
between a translation and the English version of this whitepaper, the English version prevails. 
 

No third party affiliation or endorsements:  references in this whitepaper to specific companies and 

platforms are for illustrative purposes only. Other than Gibraltar Stock Exchange, GBX and the advisors listed 
in Section 29, the use of any company and/or platform names and trademarks does not imply any affiliation 
with, or endorsement by, any of those parties.  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 3 

    

 

 

 

Table of Contents 

Token Sale Summary 5 

Introduction 6 

Part A – Industry and Project Overview 8 

1 Industry overview 8 

2 Gibraltar – DLT Regulatory Framework 8 

3 GBX, the “Crypto Harbour” 10 

4 GSX, a stock exchange for tokenised securities 10 

5 GBX Ecosystem, the financial services and fintech ecosystem 11 

6 The Rock Token 12 

7 The GBX vision 12 

Part B – The GBX Market 13 

8 Token sale platform for utility tokens 13 

9 Digital asset exchange 18 

Part C – The GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange 20 

10 Overview 20 

11 About GSX 20 

12 About the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange 21 

Part D – The GBX Ecosystem 22 

13 GBX Ecosystem 22 

14 Gibraltar fintech ecosystem 24 

Part E – Development Approach 25 

15 Phased development approach 25 

16 Project budget 26 

Part F – Community, the GBX Alliance, the GBX Alliance Council and the GBX 
Blockchain Innovation Centre 27 

17 Community 27 

18 GBX Alliance 27 

19 GBX Alliance Council 28 

20 GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre 28 

Part G – The Rock Token 31 

21 Overview 31 

22 Utility token 31 

23 Rock Token issuance 33 

24 Sale model 34 

25 Rock Token distribution 34 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 4 

    

 

 

 

26 Use of proceeds 35 

Part H – Corporate Governance, GBX Team and Advisors 36 

27 Corporate governance 36 

28 Technology team leaders 38 

29 Advisory Team 39 

Conclusion 42 

Key Facts Schedule 43 

i About GBX Limited 43 

ii About the Project 44 

iii About the Rock Token 45 

iv About the Token Sale 45 

Appendix – Proposed GBX fee schedule 47 

 
  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 5 

    

 

 

 

Token Sale Summary 

The following is provided for summary purposes only and does not form part of any agreement to 
purchase Rock Tokens. 

Seller GBX Limited (“GBX”) 
Private company limited by shares 
Incorporated and registered in Gibraltar 
Company number: 116223  
Registered office: 6A Queensway, GX11 1AA, Gibraltar 

Website www.gbx.gi (“Website”) 

Token name  Rock Token 

Ticker RKT 

Project name “Gibraltar Blockchain Exchange” or “GBX” 

Project summary The Project comprises two key components: 

(a) establishing GBX, a marketplace for utility tokens and digital assets 
operating within Gibraltar’s regulatory framework; and 

(b) creating a financial services and fintech ecosystem with multiple products 
and services. 

GBX is launching an initial token sale for its utility token, the Rock Token (“RKT”), 
which is intended to support the functioning of GBX and the financial services and 
fintech ecosystem. 

Public sale period Approximately early February 2018 unless fully sold prior.  

Confirmed date will be published in due course. 

Total Token supply 900,000,000 RKT  

Minimum sale target USD $10,000,000 

Token price for this 
Token Sale 

USD $0.10 = 1 RKT, exclusive of transaction fees or costs. 

Tokens may be purchased in fractions up to 18 decimal places. 

Accepted payment 
methods 

USD transferred to the bank account specified on the Website. (For Pre-sale only) 

ETH transferred to the digital address specified on the Website, payable at the 
applicable ETH price determined by GBX and specified on the Website at the time 
of purchase. 

GBX will never publish any Token Sale account or address anywhere except 
on its Website. 

Distribution date Anticipated to be in February 2018, subject to completion of any verification 
measures undertaken by GBX and other relevant factors. 

GBX will specify the exact date on the Website in due course. 

  

http://www.gbx.gi/


GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 6 

    

 

 

 

Introduction 

GBX Limited, a subsidiary of GSX Limited - the Gibraltar Stock Exchange (“GSX”), is launching an initial 
token sale (“Token Sale”) for the Gibraltar Blockchain Exchange (“GBX”) utility token, the Rock Token 
(“RKT”).   

GBX – the first of its kind  

The GBX aims to be the world’s first licensed and regulated token sale platform and digital asset 
exchange, operated by a European Union (“EU”) regulated stock exchange.  

Using a sponsor and rules-based system, the GBX will apply to be licensed by the Gibraltar Financial 
Services Commission (“GFSC”) under the Financial Services (Distributed Ledger Technology Providers) 
Regulations 2017 (“DLT Regulations”), which came into operation on 1 January 2018 in Gibraltar.  

More specifically, GBX is expected to be: 

(a) a global listing and token sales springboard for utility tokens that have satisfied a 

strict due diligence process and admission process set out in the “GBX Rules”; and  

(b) a high-quality digital asset exchange, including a marketplace where issuers of utility 

tokens, traders and investors can participate with confidence and trust in a platform where the 
tokens listed have been subjected to an institutional grade approval process. 

Commitment to digital assets  

The GSX intends to develop a fully tokenised stock exchange system that will aim to provide a pathway 
from listing and trading initial token sales through to accessing funding via the traditional bond market or 
equity issuance route.  This should give issuers an opportunity to issue tokenised securities to a wider 
capital base. 

Why Rock Token matters 

Rock Token is the proposed “currency of choice” for GBX and its supporting financial services and 

fintech ecosystem. 
 
In designing the utility aspects of the Rock Token, GBX considered several questions: 

• What is the core brand and value proposition of the GBX platform itself? 

• Who are the intended users of the platform, and how are they likely to perceive RKT’s value? 

• How can the token be used to incentivise ideal behaviour, discourage misbehaviour, and 
improve the overall user experience? 

• What is the roadmap of the project, and how can Rock Token support that? 

This whitepaper explains how the Rock Token serves the GBX platform in three primary ways: 

● Create an engaged community, reflecting the shared buy-in in the overall vision. 

● Deliver premium opportunities for users committed to a safe, forward-thinking industry. 

● Incentivise community members to uphold GBX values. 

Rock Token helps the GBX brand to be anchored in trust and integrity.  See Part G for further details. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 7 

    

 

 

 

About this document 

This whitepaper details the GBX strategy, our vision for the broader ecosystem, key aspects of the 
issuance of the RKT and how RKT is expected to be applied throughout GBX.  

The “Key Facts Schedule” also provides a summary of the key information about GBX Limited, GBX, RKT 
and the Token Sale.  Any sale of Rock Tokens is subject to separate terms and is not available in all 
jurisdictions and to all purchasers. 

All projects carry variables and contingencies. For the avoidance of doubt, the licensing of GBX and certain other 
initiatives as proposed in this whitepaper are subject to regulatory approval. 

You must read all relevant documents and obtain the advice you need before making 

any decision to purchase Rock Tokens.  RKT is not for everyone. 

  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 8 

    

 

 

 

Part A – Industry and Project Overview 

 

1 Industry overview 

World Economic Forum – June 2017: 

“Like the first generation of the internet, this second generation promises to disrupt business 
models and transform industries. Blockchain (also called distributed ledger), the technology 
enabling cryptocurrencies like Bitcoin and Ethereum, is pulling us into a new era of openness, 

decentralization and global inclusion.”
1

 

We are fortunate to live in a disruptive time. Since the invention of Bitcoin in 2008, the ideals of 
decentralisation, public consensus, and creating new trust models between parties conducting 
transactions has been embraced. Principles of consensus, efficiency and mutual trust are 
treasured by the community, as demonstrated by the rapid adoption of blockchain technology, 
cryptocurrencies and other digital assets by both businesses and individuals in numerous 
jurisdictions globally. 

Token sales have captured imaginations, giving rise to a wide range of innovative new projects 
and generating unexpectedly large amounts of funds. To date, over USD $3.4 billion has been 
raised via token sales (source: Coindesk). The flexibility and speed to market of token sales has 
created a fundamental change in fund raising, however, it comes with several associated risks. 
Governments and regulators around the world have struggled to find a solution for dealing with 
fund raising via token issuance without inhibiting business or the development of new technology. 

At a high level, we can categorise three types of digital assets as follows: 

(a) medium of exchange digital assets:  these are digital coins and other digital 

assets, such as Bitcoin, in which encryption techniques are used to regulate the 
generation of units and verify their transfer. They operate independently of a central bank 
or other issuer; 

(b) utility tokens:  these are digital assets that are intended to facilitate access to 

services or units of services that can be purchased with those assets. These tokens can 
be compared to API keys, used to access the service; and 

(c) tokenised securities:  these are digital assets that represent a regulated “security” 

product in a particular jurisdiction.  Regulations and structures vary widely, but generally, 
this can capture products that are (or reflect interests in) shares, debentures, managed 
investment schemes and structured products. 

Digital assets can also serve as digital representations of tangible assets.  There are also various 
other possible types of digital assets and more will undoubtedly emerge. 

2 Gibraltar – DLT Regulatory Framework 

In January 2016, HM Government of Gibraltar published for consultation a document titled, 
“Virtual Currency: Outline Regulatory Framework” for the consideration of regulating distributed 
ledger technology (“DLT”) firms. After considering the feedback received, further detailed work 
continued on this project. The consultation process indicated a strong preference from firms for 
the GFSC to be the regulator for such activities.1 

                                                      
1 http://www.fsc.gi/news/cryptocurrency-working-group-distributed-ledger-technology-dlt-the-way-forward-231 

http://www.fsc.gi/news/cryptocurrency-working-group-distributed-ledger-technology-dlt-the-way-forward-231


GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 9 

    

 

 

 

On 9 May 2017 the GFSC, in conjunction with HM Government of Gibraltar, published a 
consultation paper entitled “Proposals for a DLT Regulatory Framework”.2  

 
The paper included 

the “three pillars” of the desired regulatory outcomes and the “nine DLT principles”.   

The consultation paper explored an approach to: 

(a) provide regulatory certainty for DLT firms based in and operating from Gibraltar; 

(b) provide a regulatory framework that recognises DLT is still a nascent technology that is 
rapidly-evolving; 

(c) provide a responsive regulatory framework; 

(d) encourage growth in technology and fintech skills in the jurisdiction; 

(e) provide sufficient flexibility to enable the effective regulation of novel business activities, 
products, processes, and business models; 

(f) enhance consumer confidence in dealing with properly regulated firms using novel 
technology; and 

(g) encourage DLT firms to be established in Gibraltar because there is an appropriate 
regime for regulating their activities. 

On 12 October 2017, HM Government of Gibraltar published the DLT Regulations.3 
 
The DLT 

Regulations came into operation on 1 January 2018.  When establishing the regulatory 
framework HM Government of Gibraltar recognised that it should be flexible to adapt to new 
cases and new uses of DLT and that it needed to be able to be applied to a wide variation of 
DLT firms and, as such, the DLT Regulations are principles based as opposed to being 
prescriptive. 

The “nine DLT principles” require that a DLT firm must: 

(a) conduct its business with honesty and integrity; 

(b) pay due regard to the interests and needs of each and all its customers and must 
communicate with its customers in a way which is fair, clear and not misleading; 

(c) maintain adequate financial and non-financial resources; 

(d) manage and control its business effectively, and conduct its business with due skill, care 
and diligence, including having proper regard to risks to its business and customers; 

(e) have effective arrangements in place for the protection of client assets and money when 
it is responsible for them; 

(f) have effective corporate governance arrangements; 

(g) ensure that all systems and security access protocols are maintained to appropriate high 
standards; 

(h) have systems in place to prevent, detect and disclose financial crime risks such as 
money laundering and terrorist financing; and 

                                                      
2 http://www.fsc.gi/uploads/20170508%20DLT%20Consultation%20.pdf 
3 http://www.gibraltarlaws.gov.gi/articles/2017s204.pdf 

http://www.fsc.gi/uploads/20170508%20DLT%20Consultation%20.pdf
http://www.gibraltarlaws.gov.gi/articles/2017s204.pdf


GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 10 

    

 

 

 

(i) be resilient and must develop contingency plans for the orderly and solvent winding down 
of its business. 

3 GBX, the “Crypto Harbour” 

GBX is a member of the GSX group of companies, of which GSX Group Limited is ultimate 
parent (“GSX Group”). GBX proposes to establish the Gibraltar Blockchain Exchange (GBX) and 
seek approval from the Gibraltar regulator within Gibraltar’s DLT regulatory framework.   

The aim is for GBX to become a fully integrated utility token sale platform and digital asset 
exchange (“GBX Market”) licensed under the DLT regulations during the first half of 2018. 

GBX is in a unique position to offer the GBX Market within the environment of a stock exchange 
and therefore provide much-needed anti-money laundering and know-your-customer 
(“AML/KYC”) standards, quality control, accountability and transparency to the digital asset 
market. With the corporate governance, management expertise and regulatory experience of the 
GSX, GBX proposes to follow a similar governance and rules-based system for admission and 
trading of digital assets and cryptocurrencies. 

Further details regarding the GBX Market are described in Part B. 

 

4 GSX, a stock exchange for tokenised securities 

GBX is a subsidiary of GSX. 

GSX operates the Gibraltar Stock Exchange, a regulated market under European Union 
regulations and is a member of both the Hyperledger Alliance

 
and the Ethereum Enterprise 

Alliance.  

GSX proposes to provide a blockchain-based exchange for capital markets and will aim to be the 
world’s first stock exchange for tokenised securities (“GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange”) to 
provide a new level of access, liquidity and transparency in the capital markets. Issuers of tokens 
listed on GBX may have access to the GSX capital markets pathway, giving more options for 
capital raising, and access to a more diverse investor base as they grow.  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 11 

    

 

 

 

Further details regarding the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange are described in Part C. 

 

5 GBX Ecosystem, the financial services and fintech ecosystem 

GBX is expected to be different from other participants within the token and digital assets sector; 
in addition to operating the GBX Market, and operating within the GSX Group that has the GSX 
Tokenised Securities Exchange, it is also expected to have a financial services and fintech 
ecosystem that will provide professional services to support a full spectrum of market participants 
(“GBX Ecosystem”).   

The total offering is envisaged to ultimately comprise of: 

(a) the GBX Market; 

(b) the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange; 

(c) fund services (operational now); 

(d) corporate services (operational now); 

(e) business solutions (operational now); and 

(f) digital e-money institution. 

The GBX Ecosystem will be launched using a phased development approach:  

(i) the GBX Market commenced activities during December 2017;  

(ii) the fund services, corporate services and business solutions are already 
operational;  

(iii) the GSX is operational and currently has the facility to list funds and debt and is 
expected to launch the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange during the latter 
part of 2018; and 

(iv) the digital e-money institution is an intended business line and is expected to be 
launched during 2018. 

Further details regarding the GBX Ecosystem are described in Part D and the phased 
development approach is described in Part E. 

GBX is also committed to the global blockchain community.  GBX proposes to establish the GBX 
Alliance, a forum for building consensus, confidence and trust within the community.  It has 
already established the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre during September 2017 with the aim 
of supporting blockchain businesses in Gibraltar.  Further details regarding these initiatives are 

described in Part F. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 12 

    

 

 

 

6 The Rock Token  

The functioning of GBX Market and the GBX Ecosystem is proposed to be supported by GBX’s 
utility token: Rock Token.  

Rock Token will be structured as an ERC-20 compliant token that may be used by holders to 
access membership rights and use it as the preferred medium of exchange throughout the GBX 
Market and the GBX Ecosystem. 

Further details regarding the Rock Token are described in Part G. 

7 The GBX vision 

Bringing everything together, the GBX vision is to:  

(a) regulated market:  establish a marketplace for utility tokens and digital assets 

operating within Gibraltar’s regulatory framework that is “first in class”; 

(b) standards:  create a high standard for entry and a controlled environment with rules for 

admission and trading, with ongoing obligations and standards of conduct, under the 
GBX Rules;  

(c) quality and compliance:  pioneer the development of high quality whitepapers with 

standardised content and disclosure requirements while maintaining and ensuring 
AML/KYC compliance; 

(d) sustainable:  implement an innovative staking mechanism, ensuring all members 

have a shared ethos to grow a sustainable token and digital asset exchange ecosystem 
within the DLT regulatory framework; 

(e) liquidity and transparency:  develop GSX as a marketplace for tokenised 

securities, allowing for a new level of access, liquidity, and transparency to capital 
markets; 

(f) facilitation:  use Rock Token as a medium of exchange within the GBX Market and 

the GBX Ecosystem; 

(g) membership benefits:  enable Rock Token holders to exchange Rock Token for 

membership benefits, which may include early access rights and potential incentives;  

(h) confidence:  build public trust and consensus, to support the ideals of the crypto-

movement and to establish confidence, credibility, and liquidity to the global crypto-
community; and  

(i) inclusiveness:  leverage the experience from both the finance industry and the 

crypto-industry to enable GBX to be the bridge between the traditional financial industry 
and the blockchain community, bringing greater acceptance and inclusion for participants 
in the community from a unique institutional position.  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 13 

    

 

 

 

Part B – The GBX Market 

 

This Part B sets out GBX’s aims in respect of the GBX Market, which consists of the token sale platform 

and digital asset exchange for utility tokens, fully integrated within a single user sign-on and consolidated 
in a single website and platform. 

8 Token sale platform for utility tokens 

To achieve its goals GBX will: 

(a) create a platform that can list utility tokens; 

(b) create a rules-based system; 

(c) establish a network of firms to guide and advise token issuers through the listing process 
(“Sponsors”);   

(d) establish a network of ancillary services (in-house and external); and 

(e) establish a network of users. 

8.1 Create a token sale platform 

GBX proposes to build a high-quality token listing platform.  

By operating at a high standard and with token listing best practices, we are confident of 
attracting the best quality token listings to GBX, which should in turn attract the best quality of 
token buyers (both accredited and individual buyers). We expect this will result in an ecosystem 
of quality token buyers and token issuers, with extensive global participation. 

Key components of the GBX token sale platform include:  

(a) operation:  the GBX token sale platform will function via a website with a database 

back-end, which means users access the platform through an external application; 

(b) token admission:  tokens will be admitted to the GBX token sale platform only after 

successfully completing GBX’s compliance process; 

(c) token sale payment types:  at the initial stages of the GBX token sale platform, 

token issuers will be able to receive Ether and/or Rock Tokens in consideration for their 
token listing; 

(d) tracking performance:  token issuers will be able monitor the progress of their 

token issuance via GBX’s Website and subsequently monitor the trading of their tokens 
via GBX’s digital asset exchange;  

(e) buyer deposits and withdrawals:  token buyers will be able to deposit and 

withdraw fiat currencies and tokens to and from their wallets;  

(f) AML/KYC compliance:  token buyers will be required to undergo AML/KYC 

compliance procedures in order to open an account with GBX. Upon approval, token 
issuers can then sell their tokens to AML/KYC compliant purchasers. This arrangement 
should resolve common AML/KYC issues relating to public sales of tokens and allows for 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 14 

    

 

 

 

regulatory oversight over the token sale process by GBX acting within the framework of 
Gibraltar’s DLT Regulations;  

(g) token buyer segmentation:  token buyers will be segmented into various 

categories, based on jurisdiction, professional or individual, and token buying 
experience, which token issuers can then use to target buyer segments according to 
their various legal/jurisdictional needs; and 

(h) security:  security automation will be a core element of GBX’s systems to support its 

security infrastructure (see Section 9(g)). 

8.2 Establish clear requirements and a trusted listing process 

(a) Admission and listing requirements 

GBX will establish admission and listing requirements that will set out the process for the 
listing and admission of tokens to market, as well as ongoing obligations for listing.  
These codes will draw from community initiatives, “first in class” principles, and GSX best 
practices. 

More specifically, GBX will issue requirements relating to: 

(i) the tokens themselves, including their admission, listing, trading and continuing 
obligations; 

(ii) Sponsors, such as eligibility and obligations; and 

(iii) the operation of the GBX Market. 

There will also be overarching requirements for all GBX Market participants.  

(b) Trusted listing process 

The expected process for listing tokens is summarised below: 

(i) Appoint a Sponsor:  all token issuers seeking admission of their tokens to 

GBX (“Applicants”) must appoint a Sponsor who is responsible for reporting to 
GBX on all matters pertaining to the application, listing, and continuing 
obligations of all tokens admitted to the official list. Sponsors will need to 
conduct thorough due diligence on Applicants in accordance with standardised 
criteria. 

(ii) Prepare a whitepaper and terms:  all Applicants must publish a 

whitepaper and terms of sale with minimum content and disclosure 
requirements. GBX will publish its expectations and requirements to assist 
Applicants, Sponsors and their advisors with their preparation and submission. 

(iii) Submit documentation:  the Sponsor will submit the application to GBX. 

(iv) Review by GBX:  the application will be subject to review by GBX. Comments 

on the application are expected to be returned to the Sponsor within 10 business 
days of the first submission and 5 business days on any subsequent 
submission, but are subject to change depending on volume and the matters 
raised.  Once comments are cleared, GBX will proceed to approval. 

(v) Approval:  GBX will inform the Sponsor when the application is approved. The 

whitepaper is published by GBX on its Website. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 15 

    

 

 

 

(vi) Listed and admission to trading:  the token issuer will set the token 

offering period.  Once the token offering period has completed, the approved 
token can be traded on the secondary market of the GBX Market in accordance 
with the GBX Rules.  

(vii) Issuance:  the tokens are issued. 

Existing tokens listed and trading on other exchanges can also apply to be approved and 
admitted by GBX to its digital asset exchange but will have to comply with the GBX 
Rules in order to be admitted to trading. 

Illustrative diagram – new and existing tokens 

The following diagram demonstrates the proposed listing process for new and existing 
tokens: 

 

8.3 Establish a network of Sponsors 

GBX will play an important role in the global blockchain community and Sponsors will form an 
integral part of such a role.  

Sponsors have a duty to uphold the quality, reputation and integrity of the GBX Market. They will 
play a crucial role in maintaining quality in the market and, in particular, are responsible for 
critically assessing the appropriateness of an Applicant for admission.  

Sponsors will be required to ensure the Applicant meets the GBX eligibility criteria, is suitable for 
admission, and to assess the likelihood of an Applicant affecting the integrity and reputation of 
GBX. A vital component of such determination is the due-diligence process that Sponsors will be 
required to undertake. 

  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 16 

    

 

 

 

GBX proposes to require Sponsors to: 

(a) conduct due diligence:  adopt a consistent set of key due diligence parameters in 

accordance with the GBX requirements. Sponsors will be required to conduct due 
diligence on the Applicant’s senior management and controllers (including directors, 
shareholders and beneficial owners) as well as consider in detail, aspects of the 
Applicant’s legal, financial and commercial proposition, and the viability of the Project as 
a whole. The use of accredited third party due-diligence providers to provide detailed 
commercial compliance reports may, in certain cases, be required;  

(b) advise Applicants and liaise with GBX:  be responsible for advising Applicants 

on their obligations and guiding them through the admission process. Sponsors  are also 
responsible for dealing with GBX on all matters relating to the application, listing, and 
continuing obligations of tokens admitted to the official list; and 

(c) fit and proper:  have appropriate financial and personnel resources for the role that 

they are to perform. They must be fit and proper, have appropriate organisational 
arrangements, and will be required to undertake to GBX to accept and discharge those 
responsibilities at all times to the satisfaction of GBX.  

Drawing from “first in class” principles and GSX best practices, GBX envisages establishing a 
trusted network of Sponsors   who will play a crucial role in maintaining the quality of the GBX 
Market. GBX will set eligibility criteria and a code of conduct with the aim of attracting world 
class, proven experts in the token sale sector.  

Innovative fee and staking mechanisms will help ensure Sponsors have a shared ethos to grow 
GBX with responsibility and accountability. The specific mechanisms envisaged are as follows 

(See Part G for more details): 

(i) Fee payment – Fees paid by an Applicant to a Sponsor should include at 

least 20% of the total fees payable to the Sponsor for non-disbursement fees 
paid in the Applicant’s tokens. The Sponsor will be obliged to hold these tokens 
for a minimum of 6 months when vesting (or “lock-up”) restrictions will be lifted.  

(ii) Staking – In addition, each Sponsor will stake a fixed amount of Rock Tokens 

(to be held in GBX escrow) for 12 months, equivalent to 0.5% of the total tokens 
issued through each token sale that they are sponsoring and which are admitted 
to trading on GBX.  

The full details of the Sponsor rules and application requirements will be released in the separate 
“Sponsor Rules” once finalised. 

Presently, there is interest from more than 20 well-qualified organisations to be Sponsors.  More 
are expected to be added over time. 

8.4 Establish the GBX Ecosystem 

The GBX Ecosystem is expected to be a network of ancillary services both in-house and external 
to support the GBX token sale platform, from payment facilities to company formation and due-

diligence services.  This is described further in Part D. 

GBX aims to work only with the highest quality firms to assist token issuers and the development 
of the community in general. By doing so, GBX will form a centre for excellence for token 
issuance and token sales. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 17 

    

 

 

 

8.5 Establish a network of users 

For the GBX token sale market to operate effectively the market will require participants 
(“users”).  GBX is committed to creating a broad base and efficient marketplace for both buyers 
and sellers. 

GBX’s token sale platform will be designed to be user-friendly for both issuers and users.  For 
example: 

(a) categorising tokens: token issuances are proposed to be categorised to allow users 

to filter token listings by individual or multiple criteria, such as, geography and activity, 
experience in participating in token sales, accredited institution or individual, in order to 
identify their preferred choice of token. This will aim to allow token issuers to be able to 
target the right kind of participants based on their business or legal requirements.  

(b) communication: the GBX platform’s messaging service will allow users to contact 

token issuers directly;  

(c) ease of use: users will be able to deposit and withdraw fiat currencies and tokens to 

and from their account, and will be able to acquire token issuances via “one-click” 
participation; 

(d) AML/KYC standards: all users of GBX’s token sale platform will have to pass 

AML/KYC compliance standards. They will have assurance that they have an account in 
a regulated token sale market along with other users that have also passed the same 
AML/KYC compliance standards. 

The functionality and controls of the token sale platform will not alone be sufficient to attract 
users. A marketplace is created by buyers and sellers. Therefore, token issuers and users need 
to be aware that the GBX token sale platform exists. GBX has a public relations program and 
media strategy, as well as community and content managers who will raise awareness of GBX 
within the crypto-community. GBX will produce content and news on leading social media 
platforms including Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, GitHub, Telegram, Reddit, as well as other 
social community channels and newspaper publications. GBX will also generate news and 
awareness with respect to its token sale platform via its community initiatives including, but not 
limited to, the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre. 

All activities and opportunities for access will be subject to applicable law.  This means, for 
example, that GBX may limit participation access to all or certain tokens in order to comply with 
the laws of other jurisdictions. 

 

 

 

“The GBX marketplace is  
akin to issuing tokens into  

a large pool of  
AML/KYC cleared buyers” 

 

- Nick Cowan Group CEO 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 18 

    

 

 

 

9 Digital asset exchange 

GBX’s digital asset exchange is expected to connect buyers and sellers in the secondary trading 
market to buy, sell, or exchange digital assets and cryptocurrencies for other digital assets and 
cryptocurrencies, or for fiat currency, utilising the single user sign-on more fully explained and 
highlighted in Section 8.  

(a) Products 

Users will be able to buy major digital assets, such as Bitcoin, Ethereum, Dash, Ripple, 
and Litecoin that have perceived strong credibility, user base, and liquidity along with 
tokens listed on GBX’s token sale platform.  

Different tokens are expected to be incrementally added over time as the token sale 
platform and digital asset exchange develops. 

(b) Integration with the GBX token sale platform 

GBX’s token sale platform and digital asset exchange are expected to be operated as an 
integrated system which will share the same website with a database back-end and 
blockchain connectivity.  

The Website will be user friendly, and will host a range of trading features for traders and 
casual users alike, including “beginner friendly” functions. The digital asset exchange 
aims to be open constantly, and have customer service and multi-language capability. 

(c) User deposits and withdrawals 

Users are expected to be able to fund their wallet with digital assets and fiat currency 
(major currencies such as USD, GBP and EUR) via various methods of payment 
including debit and credit cards, wire transfer, and payment service providers.  

Users are also expected to be able to store, send and receive digital assets, view 
account balances, manage portfolios, and trade digital assets via their wallet.  

(d) Trading interface 

GBX envisages that the digital asset exchange will support web-based trading, as well 
as desktop applications and will have multi-language support. 

(e) AML/KYC compliance 

As highlighted in Section 8.1(f), users must pass AML/KYC compliance before they are 
permitted to open an account, after which they will be able to fund their wallet up to 
agreed limits (based on the assessment of the user at the point of account opening and 
subsequent review as applicable).  

GBX will adopt “first in class” AML/KYC policies and procedures; for example, users will 
only be able to withdraw fiat to an agreed account in the name of the user with a 
reputable bank. The AML/KYC compliance process should protect the exchange and its 
users against the risks associated with a poorly controlled environment. Subject to legal 
and regulatory restrictions, GBX expects to on-board retail and professional users alike 
who may open an account with fiat and/or digital assets, subject to passing applicable 
on-boarding and AML/KYC compliance requirements. 

 

  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 19 

    

 

 

 

(f) Market operation and fees 

GBX will endeavour to make a market in all tokens that are admitted to trading. In 
addition, GBX will seek strategic relationships with other exchanges, aiming to enable 
dual listing of tokens to increase liquidity and price transparency. However, ultimately the 
market and not GBX will set the prices within the exchange.  

The market will operate by matching buyers and sellers via “one-click” trading 
technology. Matching engine technology facilitate fast and robust trading of digital 
assets, aiming to ensure that GBX has a fast execution speed, price/time matching and 
permit an order book for trading with depth. The aim is that tokens will be matched by the 
system on the basis of users offering a number of tokens to buy/sell at a set price for a 
duration of time determined by the token holder. 

GBX’s digital asset exchange will have low transaction fees for holders and users of 
Rock Token. GBX’s digital asset exchange may have geographical restrictions in respect 
of specific user functions and product availability that may only be accessible from 
certain jurisdictions. 

(g) Security 

GBX will employ air gaps and other security protocols to minimise the risk of theft. GBX 
will adopt a multisig wallet security system whereby tokens deposited at GBX will be 
secured in various multisig wallets; and the majority of tokens will be stored offline in cold 
storage, while a small proportion of the tokens will remain in hot online storage allowing 
for faster transactions for users who perform deposits and withdrawals on the digital 
asset exchange.  Wallets will be multi-layer and allow for storing and trading between 
tokens listed on GBX. 

(h) Limits 

GBX will impose various limits on trading as well as on the purchase and sale of 
particular digital assets, based on operational, market integrity, legal and regulatory 
requirements.  Not all digital assets will be available to all users.   

 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 20 

 

 

 

 

Part C – The GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange 

 

This Part C sets out GBX’s vision in respect of the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange. 

10 Overview 

GBX and GSX clearly distinguish between utility tokens (which includes medium-of-exchange 
tokens) and tokenised securities.  

GBX is the planned regulated marketplace for utility tokens, with GSX planned to be the 
regulated marketplace for tokenised securities. 

11 About GSX 

The following chart provides an overview of the key aspects of GSX and its proposed overall 
product scope and structure. 

 

GSX is licensed and regulated by the GFSC under licence number FSC123B (issued on 11 
November 2014).   

GSX operates two markets: 

(a) GSX Main Market, an EU regulated market recognised by ESMA and by the 

United Kingdom’s tax authority (HMRC) under S1005 (1)(b) Income Tax Act 2007 for 
funds and debt securities; and 

(b) GSX Global Market, a self-regulated market which is a Multilateral Trading Facility 

(MTF) as defined under the Markets in Financial Instruments Directive 2004/39/EC 
(MiFID) for funds and debt securities. 

As a relatively new exchange, GSX has had the opportunity to develop fresh practices and 
build new infrastructure rather than being hampered by legacy systems. GSX aims to take this 
one step further by becoming one of the world’s first tokenised securities exchange, providing 
a new level of market efficiency, access, liquidity, and transparency in the capital markets. By 
GSX implementing a blockchain solution, GSX plans to build a secure and controlled 
environment for the issuance, trading, and holding of tokenised securities for market 
participants who have passed AML/KYC compliance.   



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 21 

    

 

 

12 About the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange 

12.1 Key features 

The GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange is planned to function as a transparent auditable 
ledger such that participants will be registered holders of the tokenised securities at every 
stage of the trading process.   

This is by virtue of utilising the record-keeping functionality of DLT for the benefit of the 
exchange, issuers, the participants and regulators alike. 

The GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange is expected to provide access to the capital markets 
for a wide variety of issuers and participants including:   

(a) traditional and non-traditional counterparts including global conglomerates, 
institutional licensees, operating companies, family businesses, investment vehicles, 
family offices, and ETFs; and 

(b) participants who can trade within the GSX marketplace and build investment 
portfolios with confidence and without the layers of intermediaries, barriers to entry, 
and cost associated with traditional markets. This has the potential to give 
participants access to a spectrum of investments, capital, and/or income generating 
assets that might not otherwise be possible in the same manner and to the same 
degree under a traditional stock exchange model.  

With the adoption of the blockchain-based trading system, the GSX Tokenised Securities 
Exchange will dramatically boost efficiencies whilst reducing costs by integrating the entire 
spectrum of exchange services including, but not limited to, listing, execution, clearing, 
settlement, AML/KYC controls and processes, security, digital identity management and 
custody. 

12.2 Timing and progress 

We aim to be able to list tokenised securities by Q3 2018, while employing a blockchain-
based trading system for such tokenised securities by Q4 2018.  

We are already in the design phase of a blockchain-based trading system that will be able to 
offer all the benefits and effectiveness of the DLT, while ensuring such securities remain 
registered and compliant under current EU Securities regulations during secondary trading.  

12.3 Opportunities for GBX listed token issuers 

GSX aims to open up new markets and create new opportunities for collaboration.  It will also 
serve as the next destination point for tokens listed on the GBX digital asset exchange.  

As the token issuers of the GBX token listings grow in their business, they may apply to list a 
security token on the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange and get further access to capital 
raising opportunities.  

Issuers that are listed on the GBX digital asset exchange will receive fast-track access, with 
faster processing times, to list security tokens on the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange, 
giving more options to raise capital. They will also have access to a more diverse investor 
base as they grow including possible dual listing opportunities on other stock exchanges. 

  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 22 

    

 

 

Part D – The GBX Ecosystem 

This Part D sets out GBX’s vision in respect of the GBX Ecosystem. 

13 GBX Ecosystem 

13.1 Overview 

GBX envisages creating the GBX Ecosystem, a financial services and fintech ecosystem with 
multiple products and services. 

 

The GBX Ecosystem is expected to consist of three divisions: 

1) Exchange Division 

2) Services Division 

3) E-Money Division 

It is intended that the entire GBX Ecosystem will make use of DLT, initially by both GBX and 
GSX, and thereafter by the other members of the GBX Ecosystem with an initial focus on 
AML/KYC, settlement and clearing. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 23 

    

 

 

13.2 Services Division (Juno Services) 

The services division comprises a unique offering within a stock exchange eco-system 
including company formation and supporting services, fund services (fund establishment and 
administration), business solutions (securitisation, advisory and regulatory) and support.   

 

The services division includes Juno Fund Services Limited, Juno Fiduciary Services Limited 
and its licensed nominee and company manager subsidiaries (collectively, “Juno Services”), 
all of which are former Grant Thornton4

 
service lines that were acquired by GBX on 30 

November 2017.  The former Grant Thornton service lines are existing businesses with over 
10 years operational history. 

The key entities are as follows. 

(a) Juno Fund Services Limited is licensed by the GFSC, licence number 

FSC00926B, to carry on business as a Collective Investment Scheme Administrator. 
The business line provides services to funds of varying asset classes (conventional 
“trading” funds, alternatives and DLT/crypto funds) and jurisdictions (Gibraltar, Malta, 
BVI and Cayman Islands). 

(b) Juno Fiduciary Services Limited is licensed by the GFSC, licence number 

FSC00603B, to carry on business as a Company Manager. The business line 
provides corporate services to the GBX Ecosystem, its users and participants. 

(c) Juno Nominees Limited is licensed by the GFSC, licence number FSC00604B, 

to carry on business as a Company Manager restricted to the provision of nominee 
shareholdings. 

(d) Juno Management Limited is licensed by the GFSC, licence number 

FSC00605B, to carry on business as a Company Manager restricted to the provision 
of directorships. 

(e) Juno Solutions Limited will provide solutions and services to clients of the GBX 

Ecosystem, its users and participants on an ad hoc basis with a focus on token issues 
and regulatory support. 

(f) Juno Support Limited will provide back office support to the exchange, services 

and e-money divisions. 

The Juno Services businesses will not be funded by any of the proceeds of the Token Sale. 

13.3 E-Money Division (digital e-money institution) 

The e-money division is expected to consist of a digital e-money institution.  

                                                      
4 Grant Thornton’ service lines consist of Grant Thornton Fund Administration Limited, GT Fiduciary Services Limited, GT 
Nominees Limited and GT Management Limited, former members of the Grant Thornton Gibraltar Group of Companies. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 24 

    

 

 

A digital e-money institution would facilitate the smooth transaction of business and would 
serve to make the GBX Ecosystem stronger. From a commercial point of view, a digital e-
money institution could on-board and provide services for issuers, users, participants and 
clients of the ecosystem.  

A digital e-money institution could facilitate currency exchange, peer-to-peer payments and 
peer–to-business payments for fiat and digital assets alike. The e-money institution could also 
support Rock Token and permit users to store and trade tokens, digital assets on GBX and 
tokenised securities on GSX via their e-money wallet.  

The digital e-money institution would be regulated by and be subject to the authority of the 
GFSC, and potentially other regulators. 

 

14 Gibraltar fintech ecosystem 

Gibraltar is positioning itself to become a global fintech hub and the assent to law of the DLT 
Regulations on 12 October 2017 supports this development.  

It is GBX’s view that there are four critical elements that establish and develop a fintech 
ecosystem:  

(a) business environment/access to markets; 

(b) government and regulatory support;  

(c) access to capital; and  

(d) financial and technical expertise. 

Gibraltar is seeing growth in the fintech sector with many fintech institutions choosing 
Gibraltar as a place to do business.  For example, Gnosis, Xapo and Wavecrest, along with 
some of the largest e-gaming companies in the world including bwin.party, 888.com and 
Bet365 operate from Gibraltar.  

Gibraltar has a supportive government and regulator, a favourable fiscal environment, access 
to a large pool of talent built upon the financial services and e-sectors and access to markets.  

The GBX Ecosystem intends to create fintech synergies and integration between GBX, GSX 
and members of the GBX Ecosystem to enable development of products, services and 
growth. 

  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 25 

    

 

 

Part E – Development Approach 

This Part E describes the planned approach to execute the GBX vision.  It includes the milestones 

envisaged from launch until 2019 and beyond.  
 

15 Phased development approach 

The GBX Market, the GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange and the GBX Ecosystem are 
expected to be built via a phased development approach at appropriate intervals as and when 
technology and control systems are developed, tested and approved for adoption and 
integration.  

Regulatory applications will be submitted to the GFSC in respect of GBX, GSX (licence 
extension for tokenised securities), and digital e-money institution.  

The authorisation of any licensed activity, including extension, will be subject to the approval 
of the GFSC at the appropriate time based on the merits of the respective request for 
authorisation.  Other licences and approvals in other jurisdictions may be sought in due 
course, subject to legal and regulatory advice, as well as business need. 

Phase 1 Milestones 

(Q4 2017 and Q1 2018) 

Phase 2 Milestones 

(Q1 2018 and Q2 2018) 

• Launch the Rock Token and hold the 
Rock Token sale 

• Launch the GBX token sale platform 

• Build a network of Sponsors 

• Submit an application to the GFSC for 
GBX to be a token sale platform and 
digital asset exchange regulated in 
accordance with the DLT Regulations 

• Acquire the Grant Thornton service lines 
and create the Juno Services division 

• Launch the GBX Blockchain Innovation 
Centre 

• Launch the GBX Alliance and the GBX 
Alliance Council 

• Form a centre of excellence for token and 
digital asset exchange best practices 

• Launch the GBX digital asset exchange 

 

• Submit an application to the GFSC to 
extend GSX’s licence to be the first 
regulated exchange for tokenised 
securities 

• Submit an application to the GFSC for the 
permission to operate a digital e-money 
institution or acquire an existing digital e-
money institution 

• Integrate digital e-money institution within 
the ecosystem 

  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 26 

    

 

 

Phase 3 Milestones 

(Q3 2018 to Q4 2018) 

Future Milestones 

2019 and beyond 

• List tokenised securities on GSX’s Global 
Market (exchange–regulated) and Main 
Market (EU regulated) 

• Trade tokenised securities on GSX’s own 
blockchain-based platform 

 

• Develop and expand the GBX, GSX, and 
GBX Ecosystem 

• Launch GBX and GSX exchanges and 
Juno Services division across the United 
Kingdom, Europe, the Middle East and 
Asia 

 

16 Project budget  

GBX anticipates that the following amounts will be required to successfully achieve each of 
the respective milestones: 

Milestones Estimated Costs 

Phase 1 Milestones USD $2,000,000 to US$3,000,000 

Phase 2 Milestones USD $3,500,000 to US$4,500,000 

Phase 3 Milestones USD $6,500,000 to US$7,500,000 

Future Milestones USD $10,000,000 to US$12,000,000 

GBX proposes to fund these costs primarily using the proceeds of the Token Sale, and with 
support from the excess capital of the GSX Group if the Token Sale target is not reached.  

In the long term, GBX expects the proposed various revenue streams of the GBX Market, the 
GSX Tokenised Securities Exchange, and the GBX Ecosystem should maintain its 
sustainability and ensure the long-term goals of GBX are achieved.    



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 27 

    

 

 

Part F – Community, the GBX Alliance, the GBX 
Alliance Council and the GBX Blockchain Innovation 
Centre 

 

This Part F sets out GBX’s vision in respect of the blockchain community, the GBX Alliance, the GBX 

Alliance Council and the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre to serve the blockchain community. 

17 Community 

GBX considers the well-being of the global blockchain community to be of paramount 
importance. Core to GBX’s business purpose and objective is:  

(a) building public trust and consensus; 

(b) supporting some of the key principles important to the community; 

(c) establishing confidence in and credibility of the digital assets; and 

(d) ensuring maximum liquidity in the crypto-market. 

The global token sale and digital asset market is experiencing a period of significant risk and 
uncertainty; GBX is intent on serving the community and creating a regulated business 
environment with corporate responsibility and community involvement to support the growth of 
the new digital economy. 

With the aim of serving the blockchain community, GBX will establish the GBX Alliance; and 
has already established the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre during September 2017.  

18 GBX Alliance 

The GBX Alliance will be “established with the community for the community” to support the 
development of the new digital economy in Gibraltar. The GBX Alliance will be formed from a 
cross-section of the community with international participants as well as those from Gibraltar. 

The GBX Alliance will be a forum for high-level discussions, for building consensus, 
confidence and trust and for developing thought leadership. It is expected to support the 
following: 

(a) promote and support the Gibraltar DLT sector:  support the promotion of 

Gibraltar as a DLT centre of excellence, promote adherence of the “nine DLT 
principles” of the DLT Regulations and provide a forum through which all can express 
and represent views in relation to the DLT sector in Gibraltar, including current issues, 
development, regulatory developments and building Gibraltar as a DLT centre of 
excellence; 

(b) communication and advocacy channels:  encourage an exchange of 

information and provide a channel of communication with the relevant authorities and 
professional bodies in Gibraltar and elsewhere in order to achieve common goals and 
provide input on regulatory and legislative matters relating to DLT; 

(c) discussion and cooperation:  provide a forum for members of the GBX Alliance 

and the community to discuss matters of mutual interest and promote cooperation and 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 28 

    

 

 

respect between members of the GBX Alliance and the crypto-community in general; 
and 

(d) education:  encourage and promote the continuing education of members of the 

GBX Alliance and the community in general by providing training and guest speakers 
on current and suggested programmes. 

19 GBX Alliance Council 

The GBX Alliance Council will be formed from the GBX Alliance. 

 

The GBX Alliance Council will be a small body of persons, chosen from members of the GBX 
Alliance, who will work with GBX to provide advice on both the content and the 
implementation of GBX Rules. 

As a key adviser to GBX in respect of GBX requirements, the GBX Alliance Council is planned 
to be kept separate and distinct from Sponsors to ensure impartiality, a fair evaluation 
process, and respected advice.  

Given its advisory role on some fundamentally important aspects of the governance of GBX 
and the operation of its market, it is important that the GBX Alliance Council draws its 
membership from a wide cross-section of persons and professions, both locally in Gibraltar 
and internationally.   

20 GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre 

GBX established the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre on 18 September 2017. 

The GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre has been established with the aim of enabling 
Gibraltar to be the world’s most connected tech community, by bringing customers together 
with fast-growth tech companies and world-class talent whilst providing infrastructure support. 
The aim is to create a centre for the blockchain community in Gibraltar, providing a dynamic 
workspace, an active events calendar and world class facilities to help businesses achieve 
scale. 

  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 29 

    

 

 

The vision for the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre is to: 

(a) promote and be a driving force for blockchain innovation; 

(b) foster the creation of new applications for DLT / blockchain technology with the aim of 
helping people realise their ideas for new businesses;  

(c) act as a centre for the development of new protocols, applications, and software 
related to DLT / blockchain technology; and  

(d) welcome proposals and proofs of concept related to any aspect of functionality or 
area of the DLT industry. 

The GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre is expected to work closely with the GFSC and 
Gibraltar Finance Centre to ensure consistency of message in marketing Gibraltar as a 
friendly crypto-enabled jurisdiction.  It is part of GBX’s commitment to the community to 
embrace and improve new technology and drive forward innovation and will promote 
collaboration and networking, build partnerships, facilitate sound investment and create 
employment. 

Membership of the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre is free of charge. Technology firms, 
developers, and investors are all welcome to join.   

The GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre is expected to host conferences, seminars, lectures, 
panels, meet-ups, hackathons, and competitions. The GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre 
hosted its first international event, the Blockathon, with the Broctagon Fintech Group’s 
innovation centre in Delhi, India, on 28 October 2017. Similar events are already being 
planned with partners in London, Hong Kong, South Korea, and Canada.   

 

 

The GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre will also be a vehicle for engaging with technological 
development at the multi-national corporate level. 

On 26 September 2017, the Gibraltar Stock Exchange joined the Linux Foundation’s 
Hyperledger project (“Hyperledger”), followed by the Ethereum Enterprise Alliance during 
November 2017 and is also collaborating with the IOTA Foundation for research in 
conjunction with the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre.  Amongst other things, Hyperledger 
aims to build an open source DLT framework and code base, allowing organisations to create 
specific applications, platforms, and hardware systems to help support industry specific 
business transactions. In the spirit of Hyperledger membership, the GBX Blockchain 
Innovation Centre is demonstrating a very early stage bond-trading platform at bond.bic.gi. 

file:///C:/Users/SGX/Dropbox/Advisor%20Files%20GBX/Latest%20Pitch%20Deck_WP_Presale%20Data%20Sheet/bond.bic.gi


GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 30 

    

 

 

GBX intends to support technology development initiatives and values in its engagement with 
the wider community. It will allocate human and capital resources to the development of new 
technology at the GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre, invite engagement on guiding the 
governance of its platform via the GBX Alliance and the GBX Alliance Council, and work with 
the wider Gibraltar and international communities as the blockchain industry grows. 

  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 31 

    

 

 

Part G – The Rock Token 

This Part G describes the key aspects of the proposed Rock Token and the Token Sale.  

21 Overview 

The functioning of GBX, GSX and the GBX Ecosystem are proposed to be supported by 
GBX’s utility token: the Rock Token.  

The Rock Token is an ERC-20 compliant token to be issued on the Ethereum blockchain, and 
used and accepted throughout the GBX, GSX and the GBX Ecosystem. 

The ERC-20 token standard prescribes the functions that a token on the Ethereum blockchain 
should incorporate to enable the issuance, distribution and control of tokens in a standardised 
manner.  It is a set of guidelines that a token issue contract should adhere to in order to be 
compatible with most wallet software.  The Rock Token contract will adhere to the ERC-20 
token standard by declaring six standardised function names and two standardised event 
handles.  This standardisation makes it easy for decentralised application developers to utilise 
Rock Token in the future and ensure maximum exposure and adoption. 

22 Utility token 

The Rock Token is considered to be a “utility token” and is intended to be used for: 

(a) settling of the GBX application fee ("Application Fee"), listing fees (“Listing Fees”) 
and Sponsor fees (“Sponsor Fees”) on GBX; 

(b) staking by Sponsors on GBX;   

(c) settling trading fees (“Trading Fees”) on the GBX Market; 

(d) medium to pay fees in the GBX Ecosystem including corporate services, fund 
services, business solutions and e-money services; 

(e) GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre campaigns, rewards for GBX Blockchain 
Innovation Centre campaigns and other incentives.  

It is also planned to provide: 

(f) membership to GBX, with privileged account benefits including potential discounts; 

(g) priority access to token sales; and 

(h) other potential incentives and voting rights on select community initiatives and 
developments; 

in each case subject to further consideration and legal and regulatory advice. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 32 

    

 

 

*An indication of the proposed Application Fee, Listing Fees, Sponsor Fees and Trading Fees is set out 
in the Appendix. The full details of fees and application requirements as well as the mechanism of the 
staking model and token utility will be further detailed in the separate GBX Rules. 

 

Given the expected coherence of interests among Rock Token holders, it is our view that GBX 
can be properly thought of as a community, with the following intended initial model: 

22.1 Member use  

• Member classification:  a person may apply to open an account with GBX, 

subject to compliance with applicable AML/KYC and other procedures, and any 
restrictions imposed by GBX.  All approved GBX account holders (wallets) will be 
classed as “Members”.   

• Account opening gift:  following the successful opening of an account, a Member 

will be granted 1 RKT as a gift. 

• Participation in “early-access” public sales:  any Member that holds a 

balance equal to or greater than USD $1,000 equivalent of RKT, will be eligible to 
access a higher membership tier, which entitles participation in the “early-access” 
public sale of any token sale using the GBX platform.  This period is expected to be a 
period of 24 hours before the general public sale date, and all token sales in this 
period must be paid for using RKT.  

• Trading Fees:  Members will have the option of holding a minimum amount (such 

amount to be determined in due course) of RKT and utilising it to pay their Trading 
Fees, which may result in a lower overall transactional cost.  

22.2 Issuer use 

• Issuer classification:  a person may become a GBX issuer by listing a token on 

the GBX digital asset exchange, subject to compliance with the GBX Rules.  

• Listing payments:  an issuer must settle the Application Fee and Listing Fee in 

RKT.  The Listing Fee is expected to comprise:  

o the GBX listing fee (85% of the total face value of the Listing Fees); and  

o the staked RKT (15% of the total face value of the Listing Fees). Staked RKT 
is proposed to be held in escrow and returned after 24 months if the issuer 
has complied with its obligations.  However, if it fails to do so, GBX will not 
return the RKT and it may be used for other purposes. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 33 

    

 

 

The Appendix sets out the expected initial Application Fee and Listing Fee.  

• Minimum token sale proceeds in RKT:  an issuer that lists on the GBX digital 

asset exchange must raise at least 10% of the value of tokens in RKT.  If the actual 
sale proceeds collected from the sale are in other forms of payment, then the issuer 
will have to purchase the shortfall of RKT to top it up to 10%.  

• Issuer staking of RKT:  an issuer will stake by permitting GBX to hold in escrow 

half of the Rock Tokens required to be raised as described above, for a period of 12 
months.  The issuer-staked RKT will be repayable in four equal proportions, paid 
quarterly, the first quarter being 3 months after the admission to trading of the tokens.  
The amounts staked will be held by GBX as part of a claims mechanism for any 
resolution of disputes between market participants and the issuer. GBX retains the 
right to change staking requirements as needed or consider lowering the staking 
requirements to 2.5% of the amount raised.  
 

22.3 Sponsor use 

• Sponsor classification:  a person may be approved as a Sponsor as described 

in Section 8.3.  Sponsors must comply with the Sponsor Rules. 

• Sponsor stake: Sponsors must accept or separately purchase at least 20% of 

their total fees or fee equivalent in the issuer’s tokens and must hold these tokens 
for a minimum of 6 months when vesting (or “lock-up”) restrictions will be lifted.  
Sponsors will be subject to audit requirements and will sign an annual statement of 
compliance demonstrating to GBX that they have implemented this requirement. 

• Staking for project transparency:  Sponsors must stake the equivalent in RKT 

of 0.5% of the total tokens issued through each token sale that they sponsor and 
which are admitted to trading on the GBX digital asset exchange. Such amount will be 
repaid after 12 months provided the issuer has not been in breach of their obligations.  

• Sponsor Fees:  RKT will be the only accepted means of payment for Sponsor 

Fees. 

23 Rock Token issuance 

GBX will issue 900,000,000 Rock Tokens. 

Token Name Rock Token 

Code RKT 

Issue Amount 900,000,000 

Token Sale Price USD $0.10 = 1 RKT, payable in USD or at the fixed price in ETH 
specified on the Website at the time of purchase  

Particulars ERC-20, Ethereum-based token 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 34 

    

 

 

24 Sale model 

The Token Sale will have two stages  

(a) a limited private pre-sale up to 31 December 2017, which may involve bonuses or 
discounts; and  

(b) a public sale in approximately early February 2018 unless fully sold prior. 

GBX may undertake further sales of RKT from its reserve from time to time. 

The terms and conditions of the Token Sale will be made available on the Website. 

25 Rock Token distribution 

Rock Tokens are proposed to be distributed as follows: 

Percentage 
allocation 

Token 
Holders 

Intended use Lock-up period Amount of 
RKT 

35.4%  Token Sale Private and public sale.  For Private Sale only 
– 50% of all tokens 
locked up and 
released monthly 
over 6 months 

318,556,250 
RKT for sale  

27.4% Reserve Intended to be used responsibly for 
further development and stability of the 
GBX Ecosystem.  

RKT holders may be able to acquire 
future releases of RKT from the GBX 
reserve at a discount to the market 
rate. 

Not applicable 246,443,750 
RKT 

10.5% Community 
Development 
and Liquidity 

Includes development of the GBX 
Alliance, GBX Alliance Council, GBX 
Blockchain Innovation Centre, 
community development initiatives 
including bounty programs etc, and 
providing liquidity and easy access for 
buyers to acquire RKT for its utility 
purposes. 

Not applicable 94,800,000 
RKT 

13.0% Early 
Backers, 
Partners and 
Advisors 

Recognition of their efforts and 
resources contributed to the GBX and 
the Token Sale.  

6-12 months 117,300,000 
RKT 

13.7% Founders and 
Staff 

Recognition of their efforts and 
resources contributed to the 
development of the GBX and their 
future efforts and commitment in 
developing the GBX Ecosystem. 

Locked up for first 6 
months, then 
released every 
quarter proportionally 
over 3 years 

122,900,000 
RKT 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 35 

    

 

 

26 Use of proceeds 

The proceeds from the token sale will be used to achieve the GBX Vision and allocated as 
follows: 

 

GBX expects that these amounts will be spent over the course of the phased development 

approach described further in Part E.  

The proceeds will be securely stored by GBX and disbursed in accordance with appropriate 
procedures.  GBX may invest any unused proceeds from time to time as it sees fit and it may 
also sell or exchange the proceeds for fiat currency and/or digital assets. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 36 

    

 

 

Part H – Corporate Governance, GBX Team and 
Advisors 

This Part H provides information about GBX’s corporate governance arrangements and the key team 

members and advisors that are involved in the Project. 

27 Corporate governance 

27.1 “First in class” corporate governance 

The GSX Group has adopted and embraced a “first in class” principles-based approach to 
corporate governance. The approach promotes and guides the behaviour of those responsible 
for corporate governance in order to achieve the purpose and objectives of GBX, GSX, and 
the GBX Ecosystem.  

The six overarching principles of the corporate governance approach are: 

Leadership 

Leaders shall lead with the intent of meeting 
the business purpose and objectives of the 
ecosystem in both the short and long term. 

Ethics, Honesty and Integrity 

Leaders shall ensure that the business of the 
ecosystem is conducted in an ethical, fair and 
transparent manner. Leaders shall act with 
honesty and integrity in every walk of life. 

Capability 

Leaders shall have an appropriate mix of 
knowledge, skills, qualifications and 
experience to enable them to discharge their 
duties and responsibilities effectively. 

Sustainability 

Leaders shall guide the business of the 
ecosystem to create value and allocate it fairly 
and sustainably to ensure that adequate financial 
and non-financial resources are maintained. 

Accountability 

Leaders shall be accountable and shall 
communicate to stakeholders at regular 
intervals, a fair and balanced assessment of 
how the ecosystem is achieving its business 
purpose and objectives. 

Community 

Leaders shall ensure that they uphold and protect 
the interests of the communities in which the 
ecosystem operates and safeguard the 
reputation and integrity of Gibraltar and the global 
blockchain community. 

 
The principles are intended to contribute to open and dynamic practices so that those 
responsible for corporate governance can focus on how to best apply them to achieve the 
business purpose and objectives. A robust internal control system will be adopted with 
policies and procedures that manage risk and ensure consistency in the quality of service 
being provided at all times to all stakeholders. Control systems will be designed to ensure the 
standards of regulation and compliance are applied to all business areas including adherence 
to the “nine DLT principles” of the DLT Regulations (where applicable).  

Management will be organised such that clear goals are set, with feasible strategies to 
achieve the goals, an appropriate organisation structure to deliver the goals and appropriate 
reporting and controls to monitor performance. Irrespective of the fact that the interests of 
stakeholders may be different, the corporate governance approach will treat all stakeholders 
with equal concern and respect. The tone and culture of the ecosystem will be set from the 
top with “first in class” corporate governance principles being encouraged throughout. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 37 

    

 

 

27.2 Composition 

GBX and GSX are members of the GSX Group. The GSX Group board has a balance of 
executive and non-executive directors to oversee the activities of the group. They have formed 
a committee in order to run the executive affairs of the group (“Executive Committee”). The 
Executive Committee is based in Gibraltar (head office), London and Hong Kong.  Members of 
the Executive Committee have capital markets, regulatory, technological, legal, accounting, 
private equity and financial services knowledge, skills, qualifications and experience. The 
Executive Committee has established a technology team to assist with its executive functions, 
comprising 43 full-time developers and IT support staff across three continents and an advisory 
team that includes token industry, fintech and exchange experts along with crypto-technologists 
and leading legal counsel in key markets. 

27.3 Executive Committee  

Nick Cowan – Group Chief Executive 

Officer (Gibraltar) 

Nick is the founder of the Gibraltar Stock 
Exchange. Nick has 34 years of experience in 
capital markets, including being the head of 
Equities at ING Barings, managing up to 2,500 
employees in 43 countries, including 40 stock 
exchange memberships. 
 

Adrian Hogg – Group Chief Financial 

Officer (Gibraltar) 

Adrian is a Fellow of the Institute of Chartered 
Accountants in England and Wales, Chairman 
of the Gibraltar Funds and Investments 
Association and sits on the Gibraltar Finance 
Centre Council. Adrian is a financial services 
and regulatory expert with over 20 years in the 
profession having overseen the licensing and 
establishment of the Gibraltar Stock Exchange 
and multiple licenses including an e-money 
institution, investment dealers, brokers, asset 
managers and hundreds of funds. Adrian was a 
partner of Grant Thornton Gibraltar for 10 years 
(audit, regulatory and financial services) and 
was formerly of KPMG and the Bank of East 
Asia (in the British Virgin Islands). 
 

William Rawley – Group Legal Counsel  

(Gibraltar)  
William is a Cambridge University graduate who 
qualified as a solicitor in the UK in 1996 with 
international law firm Simmons & Simmons. He 
was admitted as a Hong Kong solicitor in 1997. 
William has since worked at BNP Paribas and 
Citigroup Global Markets and is one of a select 
group of lawyers who has worked both as an in-
house counsel and as a structuring expert as 
part of front desk business teams. He has 
extensive legal and commercial experience 
gained from 23 years in major institutions with a 
specialty in legal structuring. William was 
admitted to the Gibraltar Bar in 2014. 

Philip Young – Group Chief Marketing 

Officer (London) 

Philip has over 30 years’ investment industry 
experience. Philip was part of the founding team 
of the Gibraltar Stock Exchange and before that, 
he spent 5 years with a start-up hedge fund and 
5 years with a principal emerging market private 
equity firm. Philip is a CFA Charterholder. 
 

I-Wu Wang (David) – Asia Pacific (Hong 

Kong)  
David is the CEO of Stellar Partners Limited, a 
private VC fund focusing particularly on fintech 
and information technology start-ups. David has 
more than 10 years of corporate finance, M&A 
and investment experience, specialising in 
multinational transactions and collaborations. 
David holds a MBA degree from the University of 
Hong Kong.  
 

Kai Jun Soh (Benjamin) – Asia Pacific 

(Hong Kong) 
Ben is a fintech entrepreneur. He is one of the 
co-founders of Broctagon Fintech Group and 
has built a development team of 500 employees 
in 6 countries, specialising in fintech 
technologies and solutions. He is the founder 
and vice-chairman of Stellar Partners Limited. 
 

Ta-Ming Chao Thomas - Asia Pacific 

(Hong Kong) 
Thomas has an extensive background of over 14 
years in the finance industry. Graduated from the 
University of Texas in Economics and Finance, 
he has served in banking and financial services 
firms; including banker at JP. Morgan, registered 
representative at Apex Clearing and managing 
director at Stellar Partners Limited. Thomas is 
also a co-founder of a tech firm based in China, 
where he is integrating his financial background 
into the technology advancement of the 
blockchain industry. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 38 

    

 

 

28 Technology team leaders 

The GBX technology team is led by the following experts. 

Floyd DCosta – Chief Blockchain 

Officer 

Floyd is the co-founder of Block Armour which is 
developing the next-generation enterprise 
solution for cybersecurity powered by blockchain 
technology. He is also the co-founder of 
Blockchain Foundry, a ready-to-use blockchain 
platform to help enterprises and fintech 
entrepreneurs rapidly design, deploy and 
operate distributed ledgers. Floyd was a 
management consultant at Capgemini for 13 
years specialising in the IT and Digital industries.  
 
Samuel Reid – Chief Blockchain 
Engineer 
Samuel is a mathematician, business executive, 
inventor, and STEM polymath with 10+ public 
papers & 50+ conferences, with a deep portfolio 
of classified work. As the CEO and Co-Founder 
of Geometric Energy Corporation, he provides 
advisory services and execution for technology 
feasibility and development in energy systems, 
such as solid-state sodium ion batteries, and 
blockchain, holding a research and adoption 
position at the IOTA Foundation. He is also a 
Director of SpaceBit, the world’s first non-
jurisdictional decentralised space agency. He 
was formerly the Head of Technical Stream of 
Ethereum Foundation South China. 
 

Ted Quek – Head of Technology 

Operations 

Co-Founder and Managing Director of 
Broctagon Fintech Group. Over 9 years of 
experience as CTO managing over 300 staffs in 
3 continents, specialising in Forex trading and 
institutional clearing. Founding member of the 
GBX Blockchain Innovation Centre. 

 
 

Eric Zhang – Full Stack Developer 

Lead 

Eric is one of the lead full stack developers. Eric 
has an MSc in Software Engineering from the 
University of Science and Technology of China 
and was one of the lead programmers for global 
crypto exchange ViaBTC. 

 

 

Daryl McFarlane – GSX Chief 

Technology Officer 

Daryl is a System Specialist that joined GSX in 
2014. Daryl is responsible for the development 
and management of all GSX systems ensuring 
compliance and smooth operation in a regulated 
market. 

 

 

 

The full GBX Technology Team consists of 43 full-time developers and IT 

support staff across three continents. 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 39 

    

 

 

29 Advisory Team 

29.1 Key advisors 

Jehan Chu (Strategy Advisor) 

Jehan is the co-founder and managing 
partner at Kenetic Capital which is one of the 
first blockchain venture capital and 
cryptocurrency funds and token sale advisory 
businesses in Asia. He is the founder of 
Ethereum Hong Kong, a blockchain 
technology community, and also Founding 
Member of the Bitcoin Association of Hong 
Kong established in 2014. 
 

Mike Costache (Blockchain Advisor) 

Mike is the Founder of the Blockchain 
Investment Consortium and KrowdMentor. He 
is the Co-chair of d10e and President of 
Karma International. 
 

Samson Lee (Chief Crypto-Economic 

Advisor) 

Samson is a serial tech-entrepreneur with 
over 20 years of experience in AI, blockchain, 
cryptocurrency and crypto assets, token 
sales, digital entertainment, social media, 
mobile and e-commerce. He is the co-founder 
of Ethereum South China and South Asia. 
 
 

Joey Garcia (Legal Advisor) 

Joey is a fintech and financial services partner 
at ISOLAS LLP, a leading law firm in Gibraltar. 
Joey has been at the forefront in developing 
Gibraltar’s fintech space and token and 
cryptocurrency industry. He co-chairs the 
Gibraltar Government working group/think tank 
on digital currencies. 

 

Ismail Malik (Marketing Advisor) 

Ismail is the editor in chief at ICO Crowd, the 
world’s first publication for the crypto crowd 
funding industry and is the founder and CEO of 
BlockchainLab. BlockchainLab is a specialised 
crypto development project partner alongside 
search and placement of lead developers for 
existing DLT projects with a focus on R&D. 
 

Eddy Travia (Blockchain Advisor) 

Eddy is the CEO of Coinsilium (COIN:NEX), co-
founder of Block Chain Space and Seedcoin. 

29.2 Additional strategy advisors 

 

                                                                      
 

 
 

 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 40 

    

 

 

29.3 Key legal advisors   

                                                                           
 

Other key team members 

29.4 Governance advisors 

Marcus Killick, OBE  
Marcus was CEO of the Gibraltar Financial 
Services Commission until February 2014 
having served nearly eleven years in the role. 
He is an English Barrister and member of the 
New York State Bar as well as a Chartered 
Fellow of the Chartered Institute for 
Securities and Investments and a member of 
the Chartered Management Institute 
(Diploma in Management and Leadership) 
and the Chartered Insurance Institute. 
Marcus was awarded the OBE in the 2014 
New Years Honours List. 

 
Bruno Callaghan 
Bruno is the Managing Director of Callaghan 
Insurance Brokers. He was President of the 
Gibraltar Chamber of Commerce, and was a  
member of the Government Economic 
Advisory Council. He was also the Chairman 
of United Kingdom Gibraltar Tourism 
Association. 

 
Mark Okes-Voysey 
Mark is the CEO of Line Group, which is 
associated with Hassans, Gibraltar’s leading 
international law firm. He is an ex-Executive 
Board member of PwC Central and Eastern 
Europe, specifically leading the Advisory 
Service across 30 countries in that region.  
 
 
 

Simon Brickles 
Simon is a former barrister who has run two 
of the UK’s three full equity markets. Under 
his leadership, AIM became one of the most 
successful growth markets in the world 
attracting more companies than all the other 
growth markets in Europe combined and 
raising around USD $100 billion. Simon also 
created the first, new full stock exchange in 
London for two hundred years, PLUS 
Markets plc. Simon brought together traders 
and investors to create and promote a new 
secondary platform, which within months of 
its launch, was trading in excess of USD $1 
billion per month. 

 
Yew Kiat Phang 
Phang is the Vice Chairman and CEO of 
Credit China FinTech Holdings Limited, a 
leading publicly listed fintech group in Asia, 
with a growing presence in China and South 
East Asia region. Headquartered in Hong 
Kong, the company successfully established 
a fully integrated fintech ecosystem, 
providing 24/7 and one-stop efficient 
intelligent financial lifestyle services to over 
60 million registered small and medium-sized 
enterprises and middle-class consumers via 
internet and mobile internet channels. Phang 
is the Vice Chairman to United Nations - 
Economic and Social Commission for Asia 
and the Pacific (ESCAP) Business Advisory 
Council Task Force on Digital Economy. 
Phang is also the Founding member of the 
Global Blockchain Business Council.  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 41 

    

 

 

29.5 Regulatory team  

Regulatory development, engagement and compliance are pivotal to the success of this 
Project.  Our team includes the following experienced individuals:  

Daniel Evans  

 
Manager Listings and Development, author of the ‘Crypto 
Securities Exchange’ paper 01 November 2015, the 
proposal to integrate blockchain technology into the GSX. 

Dan Cole (DC) Regulatory and Marketing Assistant 

Caroline Cerisola Regulatory Officer 

Emmaliz Azopardi Administrative Assistant 

Fernando Sevilla (Mao) Senior Manager 

Glenn Apilan Fund Administrator 

Greta Diaz Lobo Senior Manager 

Heather Adamson Fund Administrator 

James Byrne Company Manager 

Lara Cowan Finance Manager 

Louise Montegriffo Legal and Compliance Assistant 

Priya Vaswani Fund Administrator 

Rosanna Yeats Senior Administrator 

Sarah Espigares Compliance Officer and MLRO 

Tyrene Edwards Supervisor (Legal and Compliance) 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 42 

    

 

 

Conclusion 

In less than 10 years since the invention of Bitcoin, decentralisation and the rapid adoption of the 
blockchain has created opportunities to develop and change the way we live and work, giving rise to 
innovative ways to raise capital via token sales.  
 
On 12 October 2017, HM Government of Gibraltar published the DLT Regulations. Gibraltar is 
positioning itself as a world leader in innovation, embracing change by creating a regulated 
environment in which distributed ledger technology can flourish. 
 
GBX and GSX, the Gibraltar Stock Exchange, have a unique objective, to be one of the world first 
licensed and regulated exchanges for both utility tokens and tokenised securities, operating entirely 
on the blockchain. 
 
Using a Sponsor-based rules system, a strict due diligence process and strong conduct principles, a 
market place will be created where issuers, traders and investors can participate with confidence and 
trust.   
 
To support our expansion, GBX will issue its utility token, the Rock Token, providing membership and 
access to our exchanges and financial services ecosystem. Contributors to the Token Sale can take the 
opportunity to become an early adopter of what is likely to be a significantly disruptive capital market. 
GBX, together with the Rock Token, signals the dawning of a new era of best practices in the token sale 
space.  Greater disclosures and transparency, coupled with innovative staking mechanisms, should lead 
to a higher quality market place for issuers and participants. 
 
We are committed to the crypto-revolution and bring to the world our newest market, GBX, the Gibraltar 
Blockchain Exchange, which along with GSX, the Gibraltar Stock Exchange, provide a stamp of 
excellence to attract viable high quality tokens and securities listings with supporting exchange 
infrastructure for the entire crypto-community. We will aim for the highest standards, on the principles 
of trust and credibility, and bring institutional respectability and recognition to the millions of crypto-
users all over the world.  We welcome you to join in our journey and acquire a unique token that will 
help contribute to enhanced disclosure, transparency and confidence. RKT, the Rock Token.  

 

Nick Cowan 
CEO GSX Group 
  



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 43 

    

 

 

Key Facts Schedule 

 

i About GBX Limited 

Seller GBX Limited (“GBX”)  
Private company limited by shares 
Incorporated and registered in Gibraltar 
Company number: 116223  
Registered office: 6A Queensway, GX11 1AA, Gibraltar 

Website www.gbx.gi  

Regulatory 
licences 

GBX intends to apply to be licensed by the GFSC under the Financial 
Services (Distributed Ledger Technology Providers) Regulations 2017 
which came into operation on 1 January 2018 in Gibraltar. 

Shareholders GBX is a subsidiary of GSX Limited, licensed by the GFSC under licence 
number FSC1231B. 

Its ultimate parent is GSX Group Limited. 

About GBX GBX aims to create first licensed and regulated token sale platform and 
digital asset exchange owned by an EU-regulated stock exchange. 

As a member of the GSX Group and through such association, it is in the 
unique position to offer token sales and digital asset exchange services 
within a robust regulatory and operational environment. 

Governance  The GBX governance model is described in Section 27.   

Directors and 
key  
personnel 

The directors and the key personnel of GBX are set out in Sections 27.3, 
28 and 29.5. 

GBX confirms that none its directors have been the subject of, or involved 
in, any of the following: 

(a) unspent convictions in relation to indictable offences; 

(b) bankruptcies, receiverships, liquidations, administrations, voluntary 
arrangements of such person or of any company or partnership 
where such person was a director with an executive function or 
partner at the time of or within the 12 months preceding such events;  

(c) any official public incrimination and/or sanctions of such person by 
statutory or regulatory authorities (including designated professional 
bodies); or  

(d) disqualified by a court from acting as a director of a company or from 
acting in the management or conduct of the affairs of any company. 

http://www.gbx.gi/


GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 44 

    

 

 

Advisors and 
other service 
providers 
(including legal 
counsel, auditors, 
custodians, 
nominees and 
other third party 
service providers) 

Key advisors and service providers that have been appointed so far are 
set out in Section 29. 

The compensation arrangements for each of those parties are as follows: 

(a) Strategy advisors: Rock Tokens based on 6-12 month vesting 
schedule. 

(b) Legal advisors: fiat currency payments based on work performed. 

(c) Auditors: fiat currency payments based on work performed.   

GBX confirms that except as disclosed below, in respect of its directors 
and key personnel that there is no affiliation, conflict of interest or related 
party transactions with any of the persons listed in Section 29. 

Material legal 
disputes 

None of GBX or any of it directors are involved in any current or 
threatened legal disputes that may affect GBX or the status of the Project. 

Involvement 
in other token 
sales 

GBX has not arranged any other token sale or issued any other tokens 
prior to the date of this whitepaper. 

ii About the Project 

Project name “Gibraltar Blockchain Exchange” or “GBX” 

About the 
Project 

The Project comprises two key components: 

(a) establishing GBX, a marketplace for utility tokens and 
cryptocurrencies operating within Gibraltar’s regulatory framework; 
and 

(b) creating a financial services and fintech ecosystem with multiple 
products and services. 

GBX is launching an initial token sale for its utility token, the Rock Token 
(RKT), which is intended to support the functioning of GBX and the 
financial services and fintech ecosystem.  GBX will also support the 
establishment of GSX’s marketplace for tokenised securities.   

Refer to Parts B to D for further details. 

Project 
budget 

Refer to Section 16. 

Timeline and 
current status 

Refer to Section 15. 

As of the date of this whitepaper, some of the stages of the Phase 1 
Milestones have commenced and/or are completed. 

Project 
development 
reporting 

GBX does not propose to provide formal updates to RKT holders about 
every aspect of the Project.  However, it expects to provide general 
updates from time to time on the Website. 

Material third 
party or intra-
group service 
arrangements 

A GSX Group member will enter into service arrangements with GBX for 
the purposes of GBX.  

Specifically, Broctagon Fintech Group, who will provide technology and 
customer support services to GBX. GSX Executive Director Benjamin Soh 
is the majority shareholder of the Broctagon Fintech Group and the 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 45 

    

 

 

majority shareholder of Cyberhub Fintech Holdings Limited which owns 
approximately 25% of GSX Group Limited. 

Existing 
material 
resources 
allocated for 
this Project 

GSX Group Limited has agreed to allocate the resources of the Group 
Executive Committee (see Section 27.3) to implement the GBX strategy 

Technical 
reports 

There are no other technical reports prepared by GBX for the purposes of 
this Project 

Additional 
documents 

Separate documents encapsulating the GBX Rules and related 
requirements will be published in due course 

iii About the Rock Token 

The following is provided for summary purposes only and does not form part of any 
agreement to purchase Rock Tokens. 

Token name  Rock Token 

Ticker RKT 

Token 
purpose 

Utility token within the GBX and GBX Ecosystem, with various potential 
applications.  Please refer to Section 22. 

Total Token 
supply 

900,000,000 RKT  

iv About the Token Sale 

The following is provided for summary purposes only and does not form part of any 
agreement to purchase Rock Tokens. 

All purchasers should be aware that an active secondary market in RKT may not necessarily 
develop. 

Token Sale 
terms and 
conditions 

To be made available on the Website.  Each purchaser of Rock Tokens 
must ensure that they carefully read them, obtain any necessary 
professional advice and agree to them before purchase. 

Purchase 
Website and 
instructions 

Website: www.gbx.gi  

Purchasers must follow the instructions provided on the Website to 
purchase Rock Tokens. 

Pre-sale period 1 December 2017 at 0000 Coordinated Universal Time (UTC) to 31 
December 2017 at 2359 UTC, unless fully sold prior. 

Public sale 
period 

Approximately early February 2018 unless fully sold prior. 

Minimum sale 
target 

USD $10,000,000 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 46 

    

 

 

Token price for 
this Token Sale 

USD $0.10 = 1 RKT, exclusive of transaction fees or costs. 

Tokens may be purchased in fractions up to 18 decimal places. 

Accepted 
payment 
methods 

USD transferred to the bank account specified on the Website. (For Pre-
sale only) 

ETH transferred to the digital address specified on the Website, payable 
at the applicable ETH price determined by GBX and specified on the 
Website at the time of purchase. 

GBX will never publish any Token Sale account or address 
anywhere except on its Website. 

Minimum 
purchase 
amount 

USD $200,000 for pre-sale, USD $100 for public sale. 

Distribution 
date 

Anticipated to be in February 2018, subject to completion of any 
verification measures undertaken by GBX and other relevant factors. 

GBX will specify the exact date on the Website in due course. 

Further token 
sales 

GBX may undertake further sales of RKT from its Reserve from time to 
time. 

Authorised 
communication 
channels 

The only communication channels authorised by GBX for the purposes 
of the Token Sale are: 

Website: www.gbx.gi / Email: info@gbx.gi / Twitter: @GibBlockEx/ 
Medium: @Gibraltar.Blockchain.Exchange / Facebook: @GibBlockEx /  

Telegram: https://t.me/GBXCommunity 

 

 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 47 

    

 

 

Appendix – Proposed GBX fee schedule  
 
 

Application Fee  

 

All applications to the GBX token sale platform will be subject to an Application Fee of USD $10,000, 
payable in RKT which will be non-refundable. 
 
The Application Fee pays for the full review carried out by GBX prior to approval.  
 

Listing Fees 

 
Applicants must also then pay the Listing Fees before it is allowed to be listed on the GBX digital asset 
exchange.   
 

Listing Fees 

Initial Token Sale Size (USD) Listing  Fees (USD) 

10,000,000 1% 100,000 

20,000,000 0.90% 190,000 

30,000,000 0.80% 270,000 

40,000,000 0.70% 340,000 

50,000,000 0.60% 400,000 

60,000,000 0.50% 450,000 

70,000,000 0.40% 490,000 

80,000,000 0.30% 520,000 

90,000,000 0.20% 540,000 

100,000,000 0.10% 550,000 

 
 
The Listing Fees is payable in RKT and must be paid prior to the admission of the tokens to trading. 
GBX will operate an exchange conversion facility, to provide a robust marketplace facilitating the 
conversion of fiat or major digital assets to RKT as needed.  
 
The Listing Fees are expected to comprise: 
 
1 the GBX listing fee (85% of the total face value of the Listing Fees as stated above); and  

2 the staked RKT (15% of the total face value of the Listing Fees as stated above). Staked RKT 
is proposed to be held in escrow and returned after 24 months if the issuer has complied with 
its obligations.  However, if it fails to do so, GBX will not return the RKT and it may be used for 
other purposes. 

Additional fees will be charged for corporate announcements, which will be announced via a formal 
notice published on GBX’s Website, at USD $500 per announcement payable only in RKT.  Additional 
staking is also expected to be applied (see Section 22). 
 



GBX and Rock Token Sale Whitepaper 
© GBX Limited 

 

Page 48 

    

 

 

Sponsor Fees  

 
Sponsor Fees will be split into the following: 
 
Application fee: USD $25,000 
Annual fee: USD $25,000 
 
Fees must be paid in RKT.  These are in addition to amounts required to be staked (see Section 22). 
 

Trading Fees 

 
Trading fees will be a flat fee of 10 bps if paid for in RKT or 15bps if paid in another form.  


